src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON GOAHTILONGSHORTCMP !!≈ * **@CODE@** compound lexicon, with and without vowel shortening
 +Cmp/SgNom: R ; ! Trond test: Since flag is on and off, (next lines), this should not be needed. Duommá: it did not work without this, so incommented again
 +Cmp/SgNom:X7 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom: flagOFF-R ;
! +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:W3 R ;		!



LEXICON GOADE- !!≈ * **@CODE@** genitiv
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Allegro: K ;   ! ! This escape hatch for X8 gives gieldda as Gen of gieldá.
 +Cmp/SgGen: R ; !Note! Same entry under GOADI-

LEXICON GOADE-IU- !!≈ * **@CODE@** genitiv
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Allegro: K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen: R ; !Note! Same entry under GOADI-


LEXICON GOAHTA- !!≈ * **@CODE@** Lexicon for giving Px 1. and 2. p., pluss illativ
 +Sg+Nom: NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen: NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc: NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Nom: NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Ill:s%> NPxC ;

LEXICON GOAHTAI !!≈ * **@CODE@** illative
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;

LEXICON GOADI- !!≈ * **@CODE@** weak grade
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG: R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Sg+Gen: NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc: NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:k K ;

LEXICON GOADI-_notCmp !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc: NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:k K ;


LEXICON GODII- !!≈ * **@CODE@** diphthong simplification
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn%> NPxC ;
< "+Pl":j "+Nom":d 0:%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:jd R ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc:jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com:jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:jn%> NPxPlComC ;


LEXICON GOADA- !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Gen: NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Acc: NPx2V ;

!! ## Other lexica

LEXICON STAHTACASE !!≈ * **@CODE@** for no cons grad
 GOAHTI-NE ;
 GOAHTA- ;
 GOADI- ;
 GODII- ;
 GOADA- ;
 GOADE- ;
 +Cmp/SgNom: R ;


LEXICON EGEZHAHKII !!≈ * **@CODE@**
! +Pl+Nom:jd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:jd R ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com:jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:jn%> NPxPlComC ;



LEXICON MALIS0 !!≈ * **@CODE@** as GAPPUS0. MALIS0 has no VUOHTA, GAPPUS0 has no Px Ess
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:X7 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom: flagOFF-R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđi K ;
 +Ess:i%>n K ;
! +Ess:ini%> NPxVvowch ; !^P^ ! No +Px when 3-syll. Ess-form

LEXICON MALLAS- !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Nom:00 NPx12C ;
< "+Sg":0 "+Nom":0 "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3C ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: K ; !short Gen destroys gramchk-analyze
 +Cmp/SgGen:a R ; ! !compound also for these
 +Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG: R ; !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen: NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc: K ; !short Gen destroys gramchk-analyze
 +Sg+Acc: NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:ak K ;
 +Sg+Ill:asa%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom:ijddá%> NPx1V ; ! not this TT, BÁB
 :i MALLASI-/NUORABU- ;

LEXICON MALLASI-/NUORABU- !!≈ * **@CODE@** joint cont. lexicon
 +Ess+Err/Orth:n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:jnna K ;
 +Sg+Loc:stti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:sti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth-a-á:sta%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Com:jnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:jnne%> NPxVvowch ;
< "+N":j "+Pl":d "+Nom":d 0:i 0:%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx1Vvowch ;
MALLASI-/NUORABUj- ;

LEXICON MALLASI-/NUORABUj- !!≈ * **@CODE@** joint cont. lexicon
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:jd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:jnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Gen:jddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:jddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth-a-á:jdda%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth-a-á:jdda%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:jddás%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:jnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:jddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;


LEXICON MUSH
@C.NeedNoun@ MUSHcase ;

LEXICON MUSHcase   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Deverbal nouns
 : JOHTOLAT0 ;
 :a MUSSHA ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđi K ;

LEXICON MUSSHA !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx12Vvowch ;
< "+N":%> "+Sg":0 "+Nom":0 "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3Vvowch ;
 +Ess:%>n K ;
 +Ess:%>n%> NPxC ;
 :%> LASJOBL ;


LEXICON EAMOSHcase   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Deverbal nouns
 +Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:X4 R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđi K ;
 +Ess:X4in K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X2a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:X2 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X2a K ;
!+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:X2 K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X2ak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Sg+Ill:X2ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X2is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X2in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:X2ijn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Com:X2ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:X2ij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Nom:X2 NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:X2 NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:X2 NPxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:X2asa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Loc:X2istti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Com:X2ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
!+Pl+Nom:X2ijddá%> NPx1V ;
 +Pl+Gen:X2ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:X2ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:X2ijddás%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:X2ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:X2ijddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;


LEXICON AMOSHcase !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 : MALLAS- ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom: R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđi K ;
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Sg+Nom:00 NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Sg+Acc: NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:ak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Sg+Ill:asa%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom:ijddá%> NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:ij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc:istti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Com:ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom:ijddi%> NPxVvowch ; !^P^
 +Pl+Gen:ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijddás%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:ijddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;



LEXICON BOAHTINcase   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Long compound-forms
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđi K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:# VEARA ;
 +Ess:%>in K ;   ! Dialects
 +Ess+Use/NG:%>en K ;   !Dialects
!+Ess:%>e K ; !not for nouns
 +Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:%>a R ;
 +Sg+Gen+Allegro: K ; !
 +Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
!+Sg+Acc: K ; ! We suspect the Acc is never short
 +Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>ak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
!+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>ijd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx12C  ;
 +Sg+Gen:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>asa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>istti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>isti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Com:%>ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
!+Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%> NPx1V ;
!+Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ; !^P^
 +Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:%>ijddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;
