src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the main noun lexicon
giehtatguhkit+N+Sem/Dummytag+CmpN/PlG:giehtat#guhkibu MALLASI-/NUORABU- ;
giehtatguhkit+N+Sem/Dummytag+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth:giehtah9#guhkibu MALLASI-/NUORABU- ;
mihcamár+N+Err/Lex+Sem/Time:mihcamár%> MALLAS- ; !LA: norm?
njuohtan+N+Sem/Prod-vis+CmpN/SgN:njuohtam BOAHTINcase ;
valat+N+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Orth:valag%> MALLAS- ; !LIA norm?
čalán+N+Sem/Body+Err/Orth:čalán%> MALLAS- ;
